Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4556.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; POWER OF PEOPLE LEADERSHIP INSTITUTE.new text end new text begin $2,850,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to the Power of People Leadership Institute, to predesign, design, construct, furnish, and equip the renovation of a blighted warehouse property in North Minneapolis, into a facility providing programming, employment training, physical and mental health wellness services as well as providing space as a small business incubator. The new facility will also provide administrative and office space for the organization. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until the project is completed or abandoned, subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642. new text end